West Virginia, session 2025, HB2406.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. ELIMINATING WOKE WORDS AND WOKE AGENDAS FROM GOVERNMENT COMMUNICATIONS. §1-8-1. Woke words and agendas are prohibited from being used in government communications. (a) All state offices, departments, boards, and commissions are prohibited from using exclusionary, sexist language in state government business, effective immediately.(b) In official government documents, websites, literature and in person, the following exclusionary and sexist terms shall be replaced with accurate, female-affirming alternatives:(1) Rather than "pregnant people" or "pregnant person", use "pregnant women" or "pregnant mom". (2) Rather than "chestfeeding", use "breastfeeding". (3) Rather than "body fed" or "person fed", use "breast fed".(4) Rather than "human milk", use "breast milk".(5) Rather than "birthing person", use "birth mom".(6) Rather than "laboring person", use "birth mom".(7) Rather than "menstruating person" or "menstruating people", use "woman" or "women".(8) Rather than "birth-giver", use "woman".(9) Rather than "womxn" or "womyn", use "woman".(c) This bill shall take effect on June 1, 2025.